New York, session 2025-2026, A8468.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1399-aa of the public health law, 2 as amended by chapter 13 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. "Enforcement officer" means the enforcement officer designated 5 pursuant to article thirteen-E of this chapter to enforce such article 6 and hold hearings pursuant thereto; provided that in a city with a popu- 7 lation of more than one million it shall also mean an officer or employ- 8 ee or any agency of such city that is authorized to enforce any local 9 law of such city related to the regulation of the sale of tobacco 10 products to minors, or for the purposes of section thirteen hundred 11 ninety-nine-ee of this article, the office of administrative trials and 12 hearings of such city. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10319-01-5